District of Columbia statutes.
31-915

Limitation of actions.

Any action challenging the validity of or arising out of acts taken or proposed to be taken under this chapter shall be commenced within 30 days after the effective date of the plan.

May 24, 1996, D.C. Law 11-126, § 16, 43 DCR 1551
1981 Ed., § 35-4215.